Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1232
Educational service unit; insurance coverage; authorized.

The board of any educational service unit may permit its members to participate in the educational service unit's hospitalization, medical, surgical, accident, sickness, or term life insurance coverage or any one or more of such coverages. A board member electing to participate in the insurance program of the educational service unit shall pay both the employee and the employer portions of the premium for such coverage.

An educational service unit board which opts to permit its members to participate in insurance coverage under this section shall report quarterly at a board meeting the board members who have elected such coverage. Such a report shall be made available in the educational service unit office for review by the public upon request.

Laws 1972, LB 1177, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2214;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 949;

Laws 2008, LB850, § 3.